Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

Conveyances

66-3-101. Conveyances in fraud of creditors or purchasers void.

Every gift, grant, conveyance of lands, tenements, hereditaments, goods, or chattels, or of any rent, common or profit out of the same, by writing or otherwise; and every bond, suit, judgment, or execution, had or made and contrived, of malice, fraud, covin, collusion, or guile, to the intent or purpose to delay, hinder, or defraud creditors of their just and lawful actions, suits, debts, accounts, damages, penalties, forfeitures; or to defraud or to deceive those who shall purchase the same lands, tenements, or hereditaments, or any rent, profit, or commodity out of them, shall be deemed and taken, only as against the person, such person's heirs, successors, executors, administrators, and assigns, whose debts, suits, demands, estates, or interest, by such guileful and covinous practices, shall or might be in any wise disturbed, hindered, delayed, or defrauded, to be clearly and utterly void; any pretense, color, feigned consideration, expressing of use, of any other matter or thing, to the contrary notwithstanding.

Code 1858, § 1759 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 25, § 2); Shan., § 3143; Code 1932, § 7832; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-301.

Cross-References. Conveyance to defeat distributive or elective share voidable, §31-1-105.

Creditor's bill to set conveyance aside, title 29, ch. 12.

Remedies for fraud under Uniform Commercial Code, §47-2-721.

Statute of frauds, §29-2-101.

Transfer of title obtained by fraud under Uniform Commercial Code, §47-2-403.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 447.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 14; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, §§ 1-5, 9, 14; 17 Tenn. Juris., Libel and Slander, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Fraud Imputation Under Section 523(a)(2)(A): Is a Partner Always Liable for Wrongdoing by the Partnership? (Bernice B. Donald), 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 651 (1994).

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399 (1976).

The Conundrum of Directors' Duties in Nearly Insolvent Corporations (Mike Roberts), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (1993).

66-3-102. Personal property conveyed without consideration.

If a conveyance be of goods or chattels, and be not on consideration deemed valuable in law, it shall be taken to be fraudulent, unless the same be by will duly proved and recorded, or by bill of sale or other instrument acknowledged or proved and registered according to law, or unless possession remain with the donee.

Code 1858, § 1760 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 25, § 2); Shan., § 3151; mod. Code 1932, § 7833; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-302.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 454.

66-3-103. Presumption of ownership from possession of personal property.

Possession of goods and chattels continued for five (5) years, without demand made and pursued by due process of law, shall, as to the creditors of the possessor or purchasers from the possessor, be deemed conclusive evidence that the absolute property is in such possessor, unless the contrary appear by bill of sale, deed, will, or other instrument in writing, proved or acknowledged and registered.

Code 1858, § 1761 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 25, § 2); Shan., § 3152; mod. Code 1932, § 7834; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-303.

Cross-References. Adverse possession of real property, §28-2-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 9; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, § 36; 14 Tenn. Juris., Gifts, § 11; 18 Tenn. Juris., Loans, § 4.

Law Reviews.

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399.

66-3-104. Conveyance by general warranty deed with knowledge of existing liens — Conveyance with knowledge of lack of legal or equitable interest to convey.

Any person who transfers land by execution of a general warranty deed with knowledge of outstanding liens, mortgages, deeds of trust or other claims against such transferred land with the intent to defraud, commits a Class E felony.

Any person who transfers or applies for recordation of any transfer of land by execution of either a general warranty deed or quitclaim deed, or any other devise, with knowledge that the transferor or grantor has no legal or equitable interest to convey such land commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 743, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 917, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-322; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 87; 2011, ch. 399, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.